Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-609
Railroad operating property; density factor; recalculation.

Beginning January 1, 2001, the Property Tax Administrator shall annually calculate the density factor used in distributing value along the line based upon an average of the most recent three years. If a density factor cannot be determined in this manner, the Property Tax Administrator may use other information to develop a fair and reasonable factor in lieu of the density factor.

Laws 1927, c. 174, § 1, p. 509;

C.S.1929, § 77-509;

R.S.1943, § 77-609;

Laws 1979, LB 105, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 268, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 68;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 35.

State board is required to set forth the manner in which it arrived at the assessment of a railroad and the several items included in the total assessment. Union P. R.R. Co. v. State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 170 Neb. 139, 101 N.W.2d 892 (1960); Chicago & N.W. Ry. Co. v. State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 170 Neb. 106, 101 N.W.2d 873 (1960); Chicago, B. & Q. R.R. Co. v. State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 170 Neb. 77, 101 N.W.2d 856 (1960).